Utah statutes.
48-1d-908.   Other claims against dissolved limited liability partnership.

(1)  A dissolved limited liability partnership may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the dissolved limited liability partnership to present them in accordance with the notice.

(2)  A notice under Subsection (1) must:

(a)  be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in this state in which the dissolved limited liability partnership's principal office is located or, if the principal office is not located in this state, in the county in which the office of the dissolved limited liability partnership's registered agent is or was last located and in accordance with Section 45-1-101;

(b)  describe the information required to be contained in a claim, state that the claim must be in writing, and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

(c)  state that a claim against the dissolved limited liability partnership is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced not later than three years after publication of the notice; and

(d)  unless the dissolved limited liability partnership has been throughout its existence a limited liability partnership, state that the barring of a claim against the dissolved limited liability partnership will also bar any corresponding claim against any partner or person dissociated as a partner which is based on Section 48-1d-306.

(3)  If a dissolved limited liability partnership publishes a notice in accordance with Subsection (2), the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the dissolved limited liability partnership not later than three years after the publication date of the notice:

(a)  a claimant that did not receive notice in a record under Section 48-1d-907;

(b)  a claimant whose claim was timely sent to the partnership but not acted on; and

(c)  a claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based on an event occurring after, the effective date of dissolution.

(4)  A claim not barred under this section or Section 48-1d-907 may be enforced:

(a)  against a dissolved limited liability partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets;

(b)  except as otherwise provided in Section 48-1d-909, if assets of the dissolved limited liability partnership have been distributed after dissolution, against a partner or transferee to the extent of that person's proportionate share of the claim or of the dissolved limited liability partnership's assets distributed to the partner or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but a person's total liability for all claims under this subsection may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution; and

(c)  against any person liable on the claim under Sections 48-1d-306, 48-1d-803, and 48-1d-905.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

